District of Columbia statutes.
47-124

Accounts auditable by Auditor.

All accounts for the disbursement of appropriations made either from the revenues of the District of Columbia or jointly from the revenues of the United States and the District of Columbia shall be audited by the Auditor of the District of Columbia before being transmitted to the General Accounting Office, unless otherwise specifically provided in the law making such appropriations; provided, that this provision shall not apply to disbursements on account of the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit and the United States District Court for the District of Columbia, and for interest and sinking fund on the funded debt of the District of Columbia, which disbursement shall continue to be audited as heretofore provided by law.

History

June 30, 1898, 30 Stat. 526, ch. 540
June 10, 1921, 42 Stat. 24, ch. 18, § 304
June 7, 1934, 48 Stat. 926, ch. 426
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-124.
1973 Ed., § 47-123.